Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-916
Department; family program; prevent generational continuation of abuse.

The department shall provide a family program, especially for children, to prevent the generational continuation of abuse within the family.

Laws 1978, LB 623, § 16.